District of Columbia statutes.
42-3404.08

Right of first refusal.

In addition to any and all other rights specified in this subchapter, a tenant or tenant organization shall also have the right of first refusal during the 15 days after the tenant or tenant organization has received from the owner a valid sales contract to purchase by a third party. If the contract is received during the negotiation period pursuant to § 42-3404.09(2), § 42-3404.10(2), or § 42-3404.11(2), the 15-day period will begin to run at the end of the negotiation period. In exercising rights pursuant to this section, all rights specified in this subchapter shall apply except the minimum negotiation periods specified in §§ 42-3404.09(2), 42-3404.10(2), and 42-3404.11(2).

Sept. 10, 1980, D.C. Law 3-86, § 408, 27 DCR 2975
Nov. 5, 1983, D.C. Law 5-38, § 2(j), 30 DCR 4866
Sept. 29, 1988, D.C. Law 7-154, § 2(f), 35 DCR 5715
Reenactment of Law 3-86: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3401.01.
1981 Ed., § 45-1637.
This section is referenced in § 42-2851.04.